tables/no-no-g3.ctb
# liblouis: Norwegian literary braille, 6-dot, contracted level 3
#
#-name: Norsk litterær punktskrift, 6-punkt, kortskrift nivå 3
#-index-name: Norwegian, contracted, grade 3
#-display-name: Norwegian grade 3 contracted braille
#
#+language:no
#+language:nb
#+language:nn
#+type:literary
#+direction:both
#+dots:6
#+grade:3
#+contraction:full
#
#  Copyright (C) 2005 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2005, 2012, 2026 Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
#-copyright: 2005, ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#-copyright: 2005, 2012, 2026, Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
# Created June 9, 2005 by Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com> with
# help and guidance from Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>.
# Modified Sep 30, 2005 by LU
# Modified October 25, 2005
# Modified July 2012, May 2026 by lars@lamasti.net
# Last modified September 2026, by lars@lamasti.net
#
#-author: Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com>
#-author: Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
# Official norwegian braille specifications are collected here:
# http://liblouis.io/braille-specs/norwegian
# This specific table is based on the document "Kortskrift i norsk punktskrift - KS04".
#
# Input is expected to be normalized to NFC (fully composed)
#-unicode-form:nfc
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#

include no-no-g2.ctb

# -------------- level 3 contractions -----------------
endword arar 3456-3456
endword arars 3456-3456-234
endword dede 1456-1456
endword dedes 1456-1456-234
word ene 15-2346
word enere 15-2346-12356
word eneres 15-2346-12356-234
endword enen 126-126
endword enens 126-126-234
endword erer 156-156
endword erers 156-156-234
endword etet 346-346
endword etets 346-346-234
endword nene 2346-2346
endword nenes 2346-2346-234
endword rere 12356-12356
endword reres 12356-12356-234
endword tete 1256-1256
endword tetes 1256-1256-234

endword dene 1456-2346
endword denes 1456-2346-234
endword dere 1456-12356
endword deres 1456-12356-234
endword dete 1456-1256
endword detes 1456-1256-234
endword nede 2346-1456
endword nedes 2346-1456-234
endword nere 2346-12356
endword neres 2346-12356-234
endword nete 2346-1256
endword netes 2346-1256-234

endword rede 12356-1456
endword redes 12356-1456-234
endword rene 12356-2346
endword renes 12356-2346-234
endword rete 12356-1256
endword retes 12356-1256-234

endword tede 1256-1456
endword tedes 1256-1456-234
endword tene 1256-2346
endword tenes 1256-2346-234
endword tere 1256-12356
endword teres 1256-12356-234
begword en 126
begword uen 136-126
begword er 156
begword uer 136-156
begword et 346
begword uet 136-346
word ere 15-12356
word eres 15-12356-234
word ete 15-1256
word etes 15-1256-234
word pre 1234-12356
word pres 1234-12356-234
word ten 2345-126
word tens 2345-126-234
word tre 2345-12356
word tres 2345-12356-234
word trene 2345-12356-2346
word trenes 2345-12356-2346-234

endword araktig 3456-25-13
midendword araktigs 3456-25-13-234
endword brukaktig 12-13-25-13
midendword brukaktigs 12-13-25-13-234
endword deaktig 1456-25-13
midendword deaktigs 1456-25-13-234
endword enaktig 126-25-13
midendword enaktigs 126-25-13-234
endword eraktig 156-25-13
midendword eraktigs 156-25-13-234
endword etaktig 346-25-13
midendword etaktigs 346-25-13-234
endword foraktig 1246-25-13
midendword foraktigs 1246-25-13-234
endword medaktig 146-25-13
midendword medaktigs 146-25-13-234
endword neaktig 2346-25-13
midendword neaktigs 2346-25-13-234
endword reaktig 12356-25-13
midendword reaktigs 12356-25-13-234
endword skaktig 2356-25-13
midendword skaktigs 2356-25-13-234
endword teaktig 1256-25-13
midendword teaktigs 1256-25-13-234
endword elsesaktig 26-15-234-25-13
midendword elsesaktigs 26-15-234-25-13-234
endword følgelsesaktig 124-1245-26-15-234-25-13
endword medelsesaktig 346-26-15-234-25-13
midendword følgelsesaktigs 124-1245-26-15-234-25-13-234
endword skelsesaktig 2356-26-15-234-25-13
midendword skelsesaktigs 2356-26-15-234-25-13-234
endword elseaktig 26-15-25-13
midendword elseaktigs 26-15-25-13-234
endword følgelseaktig 124-1245-26-15-25-13
midendword følgelseaktigs 124-1245-26-15-25-13-234
endword ingaktig 25-24-25-13
midendword ingaktigs 25-24-25-13-234
endword ingeaktig 26-24-25-13
midendword ingeaktigs 26-24-25-13-234
endword hetaktig 236-126-25-13
midendword hetaktigs 236-126-25-13-234
endword skhetaktig 2356-236-126-25-13
midendword skhetaktigs 2356-236-126-25-13-234
endword aktig 25-13
midendword aktigs 25-13-234

endword araktige 3456-26-13
endword brukaktige 12-13-26-13
endword deaktige 1456-26-13
endword enaktige 126-26-13
endword eraktige 156-26-13
endword etaktige 346-26-13
endword foraktige 1246-26-13
endword neaktige 2346-26-13
endword medaktige 146-26-13
endword reaktige 12356-26-13
endword skaktige 2356-26-13
endword teaktige 1256-26-13
endword elseaktige 26-15-26-13
endword elsesaktige 26-15-234-26-13
endword følgelseaktige 124-1245-26-15-26-13
endword følgelsesaktige 124-1245-26-15-234-26-13
endword skelsesaktige 2356-26-15-234-26-13
endword ingaktige 25-24-26-13
endword ingeaktige 26-24-26-13
endword hetaktige 236-26-13
endword skhetaktige 2356-236-26-13
endword aktige 26-13
endword araktiges 3456-26-13-234
endword brukaktiges 12-13-26-13-234
endword deaktiges 1456-26-13-234
endword enaktiges 126-26-13-234
endword eraktiges 156-26-13-234
endword etaktiges 346-26-13-234
endword foraktiges 1246-26-13-234
endword neaktiges 2346-26-13-234
endword medaktiges 146-26-13-234
endword reaktiges 12356-26-13-234
endword skaktiges 2356-26-13-234
endword teaktiges 1256-26-13-234
endword elseaktiges 26-15-26-13-234
endword elsesaktiges 26-15-234-26-13-234
endword følgelseaktiges 124-1245-26-15-26-13-234
endword følgelsesaktiges 124-1245-26-15-234-26-13-234
endword skelsesaktiges 2356-26-15-234-26-13-234
endword ingaktiges 25-24-26-13-234
endword ingeaktiges 26-24-26-13-234
endword hetaktiges 236-26-13-234
endword skhetaktiges 2356-236-26-13-234
endword aktiges 26-13-234

word alminneleg 1-123-134-25-1245
begword alminneleg 1-123-134-25-1245
word ualminneleg 136-1-123-134-25-1245
begword ualminneleg 136-1-123-134-25-1245
word alminnelege 1-123-134-26-1245
word ualminnelege 136-1-123-134-26-1245

word alminnelig 1-123-134-25-123
word ualminnelig 136-1-123-134-25-123
begword alminnelig 1-123-134-25-123
begword ualminnelig 136-1-123-134-25-123

word alminnelige 1-123-134-26-123
word ualminnelige 136-1-123-134-26-123

word burde 12-1456											# level 3 contractions
word både 12-145
